New Jersey, session 221, A5693.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a regional school district consisting of more than seven constituent school districts shall receive regional stabilization aid in an amount to ensure that the district receives the greater of the amount of State aid calculated pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) or the sum of the districts State school aid in the 2024-2025 school year, which sum shall include equalization aid, special education categorical aid, security categorical aid, transportation aid, adjustment aid, and the amount of a Stabilized School Budget aid grant provided to the district pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2024, c.13. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and regional stabilization aid shall first be distributed in the 2025-2026 school year.